California statutes. Water Code
The boundaries of an improvement district determined and established by the board in the resolution declaring the improvement district to be formed may be the whole or a part of the proposed improvement district described in the resolution adopted pursuant to Section 31596 and may include such additional lands, the owners of which have, by written petition filed with the board, requested be included within the improvement district. The territory of an improvement district need not be contiguous, but must be entirely within the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 442.)
-------------------------------------------

31608.

The resolution declaring the improvement district to be formed shall become effective 30 days after its adoption.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 442.)
-------------------------------------------

31609.

If a petition protesting against the adoption of the resolution declaring the improvement district to be formed is presented to the board prior to its effective date, the resolution shall be suspended and the board shall reconsider it. The petition shall be signed by not less than 10 percent of the registered voters within the proposed improvement district on the date of adoption of said resolution. If the board does not repeal the resolution against which a petition is filed, the board shall submit the resolution to the voters within such improvement district at a regular election or a special election for the purpose. The resolution shall not become effective unless and until a majority of the voters vote in favor thereof. Such election shall be conducted in the manner provided in Article 3 (commencing at Section 31405) of Chapter 2 of Part 6 of this division insofar as applicable, except that if a majority of the votes cast at said election are in favor of the resolution then the cost of such election shall be borne by the improvement district. This section shall not apply to any improvement district containing less than 100 registered voters as of the date of adoption of the resolution referred to in Section 31596.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 442.)
-------------------------------------------

31610.

After the formation of an improvement district pursuant to this chapter and if any portion of the cost of the project proposed therefor is to be financed by the issuance of bonds by the district on behalf of the improvement district, proceedings may be taken by the board for the authorization, issuance, and sale of bonds of the district on behalf of the improvement district pursuant to Section 31391. In taking such proceedings, the board shall not be required to comply with Sections 31370 to 31372, inclusive, or Sections 31385 to 31390, inclusive, but it shall proceed pursuant to Sections 31405 to 31416, inclusive, and Sections 31425 to 31429, inclusive. Any bonds issued may be refunded pursuant to Sections 31440 to 31446, inclusive, and may be made callable pursuant to Sections 31460 and 31461.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 442.)
-------------------------------------------

31611.

After the formation of an improvement district, additional lands may be included therein upon the written petition of the owners thereof and a resolution of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 442.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Taxes [31615. - 31618.]

31615.

Subject to such limitations as may be contained in the resolution declaring the improvement district to be formed, the board shall have the power in any year to cause taxes to be levied and collected in any improvement district to finance any project of such improvement district or to pay the principal of and interest on bonds issued by the district on behalf of such improvement district for the purpose of financing any project in such improvement district, and to pay the costs of administration, maintenance, and operation of any works or facilities of or for said improvement district. In the Cucamonga County Water District such tax may be levied on land only; but such restriction shall be applicable only within any improvement district formed within the district, and only so long as necessary to pay for the water facilities which may be constructed in such improvement district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 441.)
-------------------------------------------

31616.

The procedure for estimating, levying, and collecting taxes in any improvement district shall be the same as is provided in Part 7 (commencing at Section 31650) of this division for taxes on property in improvement districts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 442.)
-------------------------------------------

31617.

All taxes collected pursuant to this article shall be expended only for the payment of bond principal and interest or only for the improvement district project for which levied, except that any surplus tax proceeds levied otherwise than for payment of bond principal and interest which remain after the completion of any improvement district project for which levied shall be transferred to the bond interest and redemption fund of such improvement district, if any, otherwise to the district’s general fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 442.)
-------------------------------------------

31618.

For the purpose of any tax levied under this article, the properties within any improvement district shall be deemed to be equally benefited.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 442.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Kings County Water District Improvement District [31625. - 31625.]

31625.

One or more improvement districts may be formed in the Kings County Water District which may include all or any part of the land in the district in the manner prescribed in Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 31585) of this part for capital outlay purposes, including, but not limited to, the acquisition of stock of mutual water companies. If any such improvement district is formed pursuant to this section, assessments shall be levied, collected, and enforced exclusively upon land within such improvement district to raise the funds necessary for the purposes of such improvement district. Such assessments shall be levied, collected, and enforced at the same time and as nearly as may be practicable as annual taxes for the purposes of the district. If bonds are to be issued on behalf of any such improvement district pursuant to Section 31610, the board may, in determining the amount of debt to be incurred, include the estimated cost of all stock of mutual water companies which the board determines should be acquired by such improvement district, even though all of such stock is not then available to be so acquired.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 404.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Coachella Valley Water District Water Replenishment Assessments [31630. - 31639.]

31630.

The Coachella Valley Water District shall have the power to levy and collect water replenishment assessments, as provided in this chapter, for the purpose of replenishing ground water supplies within the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 226, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

31630.5.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “Annual” or “year” means a calendar year unless the context indicates a contrary meaning.

(b) “District” means the Coachella Valley Water District.

(c) “Fiscal year” means the period of July 1 through June 30, inclusive.

(d) “Production” or “produce” means the extraction of groundwater by pumping or any other method within the boundaries of the district or the diversion within the district of surface supplies which naturally replenish the groundwater supplies within the district and are used therein.

(e) “Producer” means any individual, partnership, association or group of individuals, lessee, firm, private corporation, or any public agency or public corporation, including, but not limited to, the Coachella Valley Water District.

(f) “Minimal pumper” means any producer who produces 25 or fewer acre-feet in any year.

(g) “Replenishment” and “replenishing” include incentive programs encouraging producers to use reclaimed water supplied by the district, or Colorado River water from the district’s Coachella Branch Canal, for irrigation or other purposes, instead of groundwater.

(h) “Supplemental water” means water from the State Water Resources Development System, or from the Colorado River Aqueduct of the Metropolitan Water District of Southern California, or from any other source which is not part of the natural replenishment of the groundwater supplies within the district, including reclaimed water.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1024, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

31631.

By May 1 of each year the board shall have prepared and presented to it an engineering survey and report concerning the groundwater supplies within the district. The report shall include the condition of the groundwater supplies, the need for replenishment, and recommendations for any replenishment program, including the source and amount of replenishment water, the cost of purchasing or producing, transporting, and spreading this water, and the cost of “in lieu” programs, including incentives to use Colorado River water or reclaimed water in place of groundwater. In connection with any proposed replenishment program, the report shall also describe the area or areas benefited, either directly or indirectly, the amount of water production produced in each area during the prior year, and shall recommend the amount of assessment to be levied upon all production within the benefited area or areas.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1024, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

31631.5.

If the board determines that funds should be raised by a replenishment assessment, it shall call a public hearing, and shall publish notice at least 10 days in advance thereof pursuant to Section 6061 of the Government Code. Notice shall also be mailed by the district to all producers as disclosed by the records of the district who may be affected by the recommended assessment. Failure of any affected producers to receive such notice shall not affect the validity of any subsequent replenishment assessment. The notice shall contain the time and place of the hearing, a generalized or common description of each area of benefit, the amount of each recommended replenishment assessment, and an invitation to all interested parties to attend and be heard in support of or in opposition to the proposed assessment. The notice shall also state that a copy of the engineering report is available for inspection at the office of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 498.)
-------------------------------------------

31632.

The hearing shall be held before the board and a quorum shall be present. The hearing may be adjourned from time to time by the president. All evidence relevant to the engineering survey and report, the recommendation that a replenishment assessment pursuant to this chapter be levied, and the determination of the area benefited by such assessment and replenishment program, may be introduced. Upon completion of the hearing, the board shall, by resolution, make specific findings on all facts relevant and material to the purposes for which a replenishment assessment, if any, may be levied under this chapter. In the event the district establishes a replenishment program and levies assessments hereunder, and such program is continued in subsequent years without substantial change and at the same rate of assessment, the board may dispense with the notice, hearing, and findings required by Section 31631.5 and this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 498.)
-------------------------------------------

31632.5.

Before July 1 of each year, the board may by resolution levy a replenishment assessment upon all water production during the following fiscal year within each area of benefit as determined by the board. The assessment within each area of benefit shall be at a uniform rate per acre-foot. The resolution shall also state the time or times at which such assessment shall be due and payable, which may be in convenient installments as determined by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 498.)
-------------------------------------------

31633.

The amount of any replenishment assessment levied within an area of benefit shall be established at the discretion of the board, except that no assessment shall exceed the sum of the following costs and charges:

(a) Those charges imposed under the contract between the district and the state for an imported water supply from the State Water Resources Development System consisting of all of the following:

(1) The variable operation, maintenance, power, and replacement component of the transportation charge.

(2) The off-aqueduct power facilities component of the transportation charge.

(3) The delta water charge.

(4) Any surplus water or unscheduled water charge.

(5) Sums paid by the district to the Desert Water Agency for payment of similar charges under a similar contract the agency has with the state as provided in the water management agreement of July 1, 1976, as amended.

(b) The cost of recharging the groundwater basin with imported water from the State Water Resources Development System not included in subdivision (a).

(c) The cost of importing and recharging water from sources other than the State Water Resources Development System.

(d) The cost of treatment and distribution of reclaimed water for recharge or for direct use in lieu of groundwater.

(e) The cost of programs providing incentives to use reclaimed water or Colorado River water in place of groundwater.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 929, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

31633.5.

Minimal pumpers may be excluded from the engineering survey and report on water production, and they shall be exempt from any replenishment assessments and reporting provisions under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 498.)
-------------------------------------------

31634.

The district, after the levying of any replenishment assessment, shall give notice thereof to all affected producers as disclosed by the records of the district. Such notice shall state the rate of assessment for each acre-foot of production during the fiscal year for which the assessment has been levied, and the dates when the assessment or installments thereof are due and payable. The notice shall be sent by first-class mail with the postage prepaid by the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 498.)
-------------------------------------------

31634.5.

Except as provided in Section 31636, each producer, on or before the dates when the assessment or installments thereof are due and payable, shall file with the district a sworn statement setting forth the total quantity of water production in acre-feet which is subject to the replenishment assessment. Such production shall be reported as of the end of the month immediately preceding the payment date. The statement shall be on a form prepared by the district, and to the extent practicable, shall identify separately the production from each well or other water-producing facility. The statement shall also include a general description or number locating such well or water-producing facility, the method or basis of the measurement or computation of production, and such other information as the district may require.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 498.)
-------------------------------------------

31635.

Any replenishment assessment levied pursuant to this chapter shall be due and payable to the district at the time or times determined by the district and stated in the notice of levy, and shall accompany the statement required from each producer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 498.)
-------------------------------------------

31636.

If the district has an agreement with any producer whereby the district regularly reads and maintains the water-measuring devices which record the production of such producer, the producer shall be exempt from the provisions of Section 31634.5. In lieu thereof, the district shall send such producer notice of its production and the amount of the replenishment assessment or installment due.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 498.)
-------------------------------------------

31636.5.

If any producer subject to a replenishment assessment, after notice has been given pursuant to Section 31634, shall fail to pay a replenishment assessment or installment thereof when due, such producer shall become liable to the district for interest at the rate of 1 percent per month on the delinquent amount.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 498.)
-------------------------------------------

31637.

Should any producer, subject to a replenishment assessment, knowingly fail to file the water-production statement, such producer shall, in addition to interest as provided in Section 31636.5, become liable to the district for a penalty of one hundred fifty dollars ($150).

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 498.)
-------------------------------------------

31637.5.

If the district has probable cause to believe that the production by any producer is unreported or, if reported, is substantially in excess of that disclosed by the statement filed by such producer, the district shall cause an investigation and report to be made concerning such production, which shall include the right to inspect the water-producing facility and any water-measuring device used therewith. The board shall thereupon determine and fix the correct amount of production for any such producer, and give written notice thereof. Any such determination made by the board shall be binding upon the producer, and the replenishment assessments based thereon together with interest and penalties shall be payable immediately, unless the producer shall file with the board within 10 days after the mailing of such notice a written protest setting forth the grounds of protest. Upon the filing of such protest the board shall hold a hearing at which time the total amount of production and the replenishment assessment shall be determined, and the interest and penalties fixed, which action shall be conclusive if based upon substantial evidence. A notice of such hearing shall be mailed to the protestant at least 10 days before the date fixed for the hearing. Notice of the determination by the board shall be mailed to the protestant. The producer shall have 20 days from the date of mailing of such notice to pay the replenishment assessment, interest, and penalties so fixed by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 498.)
-------------------------------------------

31638.

The district may, in any court having jurisdiction, bring suit against any producer to enjoin any water production in violation of any of the provisions of this chapter, and to collect any delinquent replenishment assessments, interest or penalties. The court may award interest, cost and attorney’s fees on any judgment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 498.)
-------------------------------------------

31638.5.

It shall be unlawful to produce water from within any area of benefit after one year following the levy of a replenishment assessment within such area, unless the well or other water-producing facility producing such water shall have a water-measuring device affixed thereto which is capable of measuring and registering the accumulated amount of water produced. The provisions of this section shall not be applicable to minimal pumpers. The district by written agreement with any producer shall provide, install, maintain, own and read such water-measuring device. Violation thereof shall be punishable by a fine not to exceed six hundred dollars ($600), or by imprisonment in the county jail not to exceed 30 days, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1092, Sec. 413.   Effective September 27, 1983.   Operative January 1, 1984, by Sec. 427 of Ch. 1092.)
-------------------------------------------

31639.

This chapter, applicable only to the Coachella Valley Water District, is necessary because of the special and unique problems of imported ground water recharge of ground water basins within such district and the necessity of the payment of part of such expense by a water replenishment assessment. This problem is not common to all districts formed under this division. It is therefore hereby declared that a general law cannot be made applicable and that the enactment of this chapter as a special law is necessary for the solution of problems existing in the Coachella Valley Water District.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 226, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 7. TAXES [31650. - 31822.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [31650. - 31680.]



  ARTICLE 1. In General [31650. - 31653.]

31650.

A district may cause taxes to be levied for the purpose of paying any of its obligations and to accomplish the purposes of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

31651.

If the maturity of the indebtedness created by an issue of bonds begins more than one year after the date of issuance, a tax shall be levied and collected pursuant to this part annually sufficient to pay the interest on the indebtedness as it falls due and also to constitute a sinking fund for the payment of the principal of the bonds on or before maturity.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

31652.

A district may cause taxes to be levied to pay the expenses of its formation, including fees of attorneys and others employed to conduct the formation proceedings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

31653.

A district may impose a special tax pursuant to Article 3.5 (commencing with Section 50075) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 1 of Title 5 of the Government Code. The special taxes shall be applied uniformly to all taxpayers or all real property within the district, except that unimproved property may be taxed at a lower rate than improved property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 70, Sec. 14.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Special Rate [31665. - 31675.]

31665.

Whenever the board by ordinance finds that because of circumstances existing in the district it is just and reasonable that petitions for special rates of taxation be heard and determined, any person having an interest in land may file with the secretary a verified petition alleging all of the following:

(a) His land or a described portion of it was, prior to the acquisition or establishment by the district of any water system or waterworks serving the territory in which the land is situated, irrigated from another system of works than the works of the district.

(b) It has continued ever since to be exclusively so irrigated.

(c) It is entitled to a special rate of taxation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

31666.

The petition shall request that the board determine what percentage of the reqular rates of taxation of the district should be used in levying taxes on the land described in the petition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

31667.

A fee of ten dollars ($10) shall be paid to the secretary before the filing of each petition for a special rate of taxation. The money shall be applied to the cost of the publication of the notice and other expenses of the hearing. If there is any balance after the conclusion of the hearing, it shall be returned to the petitioner or divided among the petitioners contributing thereto in proportion to the respective areas described in their petitions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

31668.

The board shall set a time and place for the hearing of a petition for a special rate of taxation or of all the petitions if more than one has been filed and shall give notice of it in a newspaper published in the county wherein the office of the district is situated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

31669.

The notice for a special rate of taxation hearing shall state all of the following:

(a) Petitions have been presented to the board praying for a determination that certain land, which need not be described in the notice, is entitled to a special rate of taxation.

(b) The names of the petitioners.

(c) The time and place set for the hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

31670.

The board shall meet at the time and place set for the hearing and proceed in the order it deems proper to hear the petitions and shall hear all competent and relevant evidence offered in support of any petition or in opposition to it and may adjourn the hearing from time to time.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

31671.

After the conclusion of the hearing, if the board finds that any of the land described in any petition has been irrigated as alleged and is not and will not be benefited by the operations of the district in a manner that would justify its taxation at the regular rate of taxation, the board shall reduce the rate of taxation on the land in an ordinance or resolution entered in full upon its minutes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

31672.

The ordinance or resolution shall:

(a) Describe the land entitled to a special rate of taxation or the respective parcels of it if separate parcels are to be assessed.

(b) Fix the percentage of the regular rate of taxation which shall be applied in levying district taxes on the land described or on each parcel of it if various parcels are found to be entitled to different special rates in order that the taxes to be levied on this land will be proportionate with the benefits which it receives or will receive from the operations of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

31673.

A certified copy of the ordinance or resolution determining that any land is entitled to a special rate of taxation shall be delivered to the county assessor, and thereafter until notified of a change in the determination, he shall enter the land described in the ordinance or resolution separately on the assessment roll and so designate it and the percentage of the regular rate of taxation to which it is entitled that it may readily be distinguished from other land not entitled to a special rate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 592.   Note: The earlier version in Stats. 1949, Ch. 274, remains applicable as prescribed by Stats. 1967, Ch. 592, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

31674.

After a copy of the ordinance or resolution is delivered to the county assessor, the officer charged with the duty of entering on the assessment roll the amount of district taxes on the land shall in making the entry observe and conform to the ordinance or resolution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 592.   Note: The earlier version in Stats. 1949, Ch. 274, remains applicable as prescribed by Stats. 1967, Ch. 592, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

31675.

The determination of the board granting or denying a special rate of taxation as to any land after a hearing pursuant to this article shall not be changed unless the board on petition by a party affected consents to another hearing or on its own motion causes notice to be served on the owner of the land to show cause why the determination should not be changed, in either of which cases another hearing shall be advertised and held as provided in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Taxation Within the Kings County Water District [31680. - 31680.]

31680.

Within the Kings County Water District, the board may by ordinance provide for the establishment of special rates of taxation, for general fund purposes and for purposes of paying principal and interest upon general obligation bonds, for relatively low water using, nonfarm, heavy manufacturing industries located entirely within the district and upon which the district’s regular rate of taxation may bear unfairly relative to benefits received from the district as compared to other taxpayers in the district. The provisions of Article 2 (commencing with Section 31665) of Chapter 1 of Part 7 of Division 12 of the Water Code shall apply herein, except for Sections 31665 and 31671.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 454.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Main Tax Procedure [31700. - 31709.]

31700.

In this chapter “district” means a county water district formed under the provisions of the County Water District Act or this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 674.)
-------------------------------------------

31701.

If a district has no revenue or if the revenues of the district are, or in the judgment of the board of directors are likely to be, inadequate to pay the interest on or principal of any bonded debt as it becomes due, or any other expenses or claims against the district, or if there are delinquent and unpaid charges, as defined in subdivision (e), outstanding, the board of directors shall, annually, on or before August 1st, furnish to the board of supervisors and to the auditor of each county, respectively, in writing:

(a) An estimate of the minimum amount of money required to be raised by taxes in the county for the payment of its proportion of the amount required to pay the principal of or interest on any bonded debt of the district or of an improvement district therein as it becomes due.

(b) A description of the improvement district benefited by the purposes of the bonded debt as stated in the resolution declaring the necessity to incur the bonded indebtedness, or, if the whole district was benefited by incurring it, a statement of that fact.

(c) An estimate of the minimum amount of money required to be raised by taxes in the county for the payment of its proportion of the amount required to meet all the charges, claims, expenditures and expenses, other than a bonded debt, of each improvement district created in the county pursuant to this division, together with a description of each such improvement district as determined by resolution of the board.

(d) An estimate of the minimum amount of money required to be raised by taxes in the county for the payment of its proportion of the amount required by the district for other expenses and claims against it.

(e) A statement of those delinquent and unpaid charges for water and other services, or either, requested in writing by the owner of the property that remain delinquent and unpaid for 60 days or more on July 1st determined by the board to be included therein.

(f) The estimate of the minimum amount of money required to be raised by taxes in the county under subdivisions (c) and (d) shall not exceed the amounts permitted by any maximum property tax rate limitation in the Revenue and Taxation Code, provided however, that if no tax was levied by the district for either the 1971–1972 or the 1972–1973 fiscal year and the district incurred expenses in such years which expenses were paid from revenues other than taxes, then the maximum levy shall not exceed fifty cents ($0.50) per one hundred dollars ($100) of assessed valuation per year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 830.)
-------------------------------------------

31701.5.

The amount of any charges for water and other services or either included in the statement of delinquent and unpaid charges pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 31701 shall be added to and become a part of the annual taxes next levied upon the property upon which the water for which the charges are unpaid was used and upon the property subject to the charges for any other district services and shall constitute a lien on that property as of the same time and in the same manner as does the tax lien securing such annual taxes. All laws applicable to the levy, collection and enforcement of municipal ad valorem taxes shall be applicable to such charges, except that if any real property to which such lien would attach has been transferred or conveyed to a bona fide purchaser for value, or if a lien of a bona fide encumbrancer for value has been created and attaches thereon, prior to the date on which the first installment of such taxes would become delinquent, then the lien which would otherwise be imposed by this section shall not attach to such real property and the delinquent and unpaid charges relating to such property shall be transferred to the unsecured roll for collection. The county shall deduct from the charges collected an amount sufficient to compensate the county for costs incurred in collecting such delinquent and unpaid charges. The amount of such compensation shall be fixed by agreement between the board of supervisors and the district’s board of directors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 861.)
-------------------------------------------

31701.6.

A district shall notify the holder of title to land whenever delinquent and unpaid charges for water and other services or either which could become a lien on such property pursuant to Section 31701.5 remain delinquent and unpaid for 60 days.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1211.)
-------------------------------------------

31701.7.

In case any charges for water or other services, or either, remain unpaid the amount of the unpaid charges may in the discretion of the district be secured at any time by filing for record in the office of the county recorder of any county, a certificate specifying the amount of such charges and the name and address of the person liable therefor.

From the time of recordation of the certificate, the amount required to be paid together with interest and penalty constitutes a lien upon all real property in the county owned by the person or afterwards, and before the lien expires, acquired by him. The lien has the force, priority, and effect of a judgment lien and shall continue for 10 years from the date of the filing of the certificate unless sooner released or otherwise discharged. The lien may, within 10 years from the filing of the certificate or within 10 years from the date of the last extension of the lien in the manner herein provided, be extended by filing for record a new certificate in the office of the county recorder of any county and from the time of such filing the lien shall be extended to the real property in such county for 10 years unless sooner released or otherwise discharged.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 335.)
-------------------------------------------

31702.

After the board of directors has furnished the estimates as required in Section 31701, the board of supervisors of each county, annually, at the time and in the manner of levying other county taxes, shall:

(a) Until each bonded debt is fully paid, levy upon the property within the district, or improvement district therein benefited by the bonded debt in the county, and cause to be collected a tax sufficient to pay the county’s proportion of the amount required to pay the principal of and interest on the bonded indebtedness to be known as the “____ County Water District Bond tax.”

(b) Until all charges, claims, expenditures and expenses other than a bonded debt of any improvement district created pursuant to this division have been fully paid, levy within such improvement district and cause to be collected a tax sufficient to pay the county’s proportion of the amount required to pay all said charges, claims, expenditures and expenses of each improvement district to be known as the “____ County Water District Improvement District No. ____ Tax.”

(c) Until all other expenses or claims against the district are fully paid, levy upon all of the property within the district in the county and cause to be collected a tax sufficient to pay the county’s proportion of the amount required to pay all those expenses or claims to be known and as the “____ County Water District General Tax.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 674.)
-------------------------------------------

31702.1.

The board may, by resolution, elect to fix its own rates of taxation, in which event it shall file certified copies thereof with the auditor, the assessor and the clerk of the board of supervisors of the county in which it is situated, on or before July 1. It shall thereafter continue to fix its own rate of taxation until it has filed with such officers certified copies of a resolution electing to the contrary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 894.)
-------------------------------------------

31702.2.

Following the board’s election, the county auditor shall, before the third Monday of August of each year, transmit to the board a written statement showing the total value of all taxable property in the district, which shall be used by the county for taxation for that year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 894.)
-------------------------------------------

31702.3.

On or before September 1 of each year, the board shall fix the rates of taxation in not to exceed four decimals, which it shall require for each of its purposes for said year, making due allowance for delinquency as fixed by law or by the board, and immediately certify said rates to the county auditor. These acts by the board are a valid assessment of the property and a valid levy of the taxes so fixed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 17.)
-------------------------------------------

31702.4.

The county auditor shall compute and enter in the county assessment roll the respective sums to be paid as a district tax on the property in the district, using the rate of levy as fixed by the board and the assessed value as found on the assessment roll.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 17.)
-------------------------------------------

31703.

Subject to any other limitations in this division contained the taxes shall be levied on property in the district as follows:

(a) The bond tax shall be levied upon the district or improvement district therein benefited by the purposes of the bonded debt, as stated in the resolution declaring the necessity of incurring the bonded debt.

(b) Each improvement district tax shall be levied solely upon the property within the improvement district as described in the resolution of the board creating such improvement district.

(c) The general tax shall be levied upon all the property within the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1182.)
-------------------------------------------

31703.1.

Upon request of the Mariana Ranchos County Water District, the board of supervisors shall levy the bond tax in proportion to the assessed valuation of the land in the district or improvement district benefited by the purposes of the bonded debt. The bond tax levied pursuant to this section constitutes a lien on all property, both real and personal, located on the land benefited by the purposes of the bonded debt.

The provisions of this section apply only with respect to bonds issued by the Mariana Ranchos County Water District, in San Bernardino County, after October 1, 1961.
